Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2145.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 12 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART VICONSUMER PROTECTIONChapter71. PFAS ChemicalsCHAPTER 71PFAS CHEMICALSSubchapter<--1234567891011121314151617 A. General ProvisionsB. Administration and EnforcementSUBCHAPTER AGENERAL PROVISIONSSec.7101. Scope of chapter.7102. Definitions.§ 7101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the prohibition of PFAS chemicals in certain products.§ 7102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adult mattress." A mattress other than a crib mattress or toddler mattress."Cosmetic." As defined in section 2 of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Covered product." Any of the following:(1) A cosmetic.(2) Dental floss.(3) A juvenile product.(4) A menstrual product."Dental floss." A waxed or unwaxed thread used to remove food particles and plaque from between the teeth and under the gums."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Intentionally added PFAS chemical." Any of the following:20260HB2145PN3517 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A PFAS chemical that is added to a product, or a component of a product, and has a functional or technical effect on the product. The term includes the components of a PFAS chemical and a PFAS chemical that is the intentional product of an added chemical.(2) A PFAS chemical that is used or produced during the manufacture or processing of a product and introduced into or onto the product. The term includes any source of a PFAS chemical that is reasonably known to be present, including the use of a processing agent, a mold release agent or fluorination."Juvenile product." As follows:(1) A product that is designed for use by an infant or child under 12 years of age.(2) The term includes a baby or toddler foam pillow, bassinet, bedside sleeper, booster seat, changing pad, child restraint system for use in motor vehicles or aircraft, co-sleeper, crib mattress, floor playmat, highchair, highchair pad, infant bouncer, infant carrier, infant seat, infant sleep positioner, infant swing, infant travel bed, infant walker, nap cot, nursing pad, nursing pillow, playmat, playpen, play yard, polyurethane foam mat, pad or pillow, portable foam nap mat, portable infant sleeper, portable hook-on chair, soft-sided portable crib, stroller or toddler mattress.(3) The term does not include:(i) An electronic product, including a personal computer, audio and video equipment, calculator, wireless phone, game console, handheld device incorporating a video screen or any associated peripheral such as a 20260HB2145PN3517 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mouse, keyboard, power supply unit or power cord.(ii) An all-terrain vehicle or ATV as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 7702 (relating to definitions).(iii) A dirt bike as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 3722 (relating to off-road vehicles in urban municipalities).(iv) A pedalcycle with electric assist as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(v) A snowmobile as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 7702.(vi) A medical device.(vii) An adult mattress."Manufacturer." As follows:(1) A person that manufactures a product or whose brand name is affixed to a product.(2) In the case of a product imported into the United States, the term includes the importer or first domestic distributor of the product if the person that manufactured or assembled the product or whose brand name is affixed to the product does not have a presence in the United States."Medical device." As the term "device" is defined in 21 U.S.C. § 321(h) (relating to definitions; generally)."Menstrual product." As follows:(1) A product that is used to collect menstruation and vaginal discharge.(2) The term includes a tampon, pad, sponge, menstruation underwear, disk or menstrual cup, whether disposable or reusable."PFAS chemical." A substance that contains a member of the class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom, including perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances.20260HB2145PN3517 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Product." As follows:(1) An item that is manufactured, assembled, packaged or otherwise prepared for sale to consumers, including the item's product components, sold or distributed for personal, residential, commercial or industrial use, including for use in making other products.(2) The term does not include:(i) A used product that is offered for sale or resale.(ii) A pharmaceutical that has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration under section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 355).(iii) A medical device that has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration under section 515 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 360e) or cleared under section 510(k) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 360(k)).(iv) A product for which Federal law governs the presence of PFAS chemicals in the product in a manner that preempts state authority."Product component." An identifiable component of a product, regardless of whether the manufacturer of the product is the manufacturer of the component.SUBCHAPTER BADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENTSec.7111. Prohibition of PFAS chemicals for covered products.7112. Enforcement of prohibition AND PENALTIES . 20260HB2145PN3517 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 7113. Penalties.7114. Rules and regulations.§ 7111. Prohibition of PFAS chemicals for covered products.(a) Covered products generally.--Beginning January 1, 2028, a person may not manufacture, sell or offer for sale in this Commonwealth, a covered product that contains an intentionally added PFAS chemical.(b) Certificate of compliance.--(1) A manufacturer of a covered product shall provide persons who offer the covered product for sale in this Commonwealth with a certificate of compliance stating that the covered product is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter and does not contain an intentionally added PFAS chemical.(2) A certificate of compliance under this subsection:(i) Shall be signed by an authorized official of the manufacturer.(ii) May be provided electronically.(3) A distributor or retailer of a covered product, if not also the manufacturer of the covered product, is not in violation of this chapter if the distributor or retailer relied in good faith on the certificate of compliance provided by the manufacturer under this subsection.(c) Noncompliance notification.--(1) No later than July 1, 2027, the manufacturer of a covered product or product component containing an intentionally added PFAS chemical that is sold, offered for sale, distributed or offered for promotional purposes in or imported into this Commonwealth shall notify each vendor, purveyor or supplier of the covered product or product 20260HB2145PN3517 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 component containing the intentionally added PFAS chemical and its lack of compliance with law.(2) The manufacturer shall obtain written confirmation from each vendor, purveyor or supplier's owner or member of senior management that the notification was received and acknowledged.(d) Applicability.--This section shall not apply to the sale or resale of a used product.§ 7112. Enforcement of prohibition AND PENALTIES . If the department has reason to believe that a covered product contains an intentionally added PFAS chemical and is being distributed, sold or offered for sale in violation of section 7111(a) (relating to prohibition of PFAS chemicals for covered products), the department may direct the manufacturer of the product to, within 30 days of the discovery:(1) provide the department with a statement attesting that the covered product does not contain an intentionally added PFAS chemical; or(2) notify persons that sell the covered product in this Commonwealth that the sale of the covered product is prohibited in this Commonwealth and provide the department with a list of the names and addresses of the persons notified.§ 7113. Penalties.A violation of this chapter constitutes an unfair method of competition and unfair or deceptive act or practice within the meaning of section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, and shall be subject to the enforcement provisions, civil penalties and private rights of action 20260HB2145PN3517 - 7 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contained in that act.§ 7114. Rules and regulations.The department shall adopt or promulgate rules or regulations necessary to implement, administer and enforce this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2145PN3517 - 8 - <--12345